el: Συμβατό παιχνίδι μπιλιάρδου: 10-ball; 15-ball; 8-ball; 9-ball; Kelly pool; Σνούκερ; Straight pool/14.1; Άλλο
tr: Uyumlu bilardo oyunu: 10 top; 15 top; 8 top; 9 top; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool/14.1; Diğer
zh-CN: 适配的台球游戏: 10 球; 15 球; 8 球; 9 球; 凯利台球; 斯诺克; 连续击球法/14.1; 其他
fi: Yhteensopiva biljardipeli: 10-pallo; 15-pallo; 8-pallo; 9-pallo; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool / 14.1; Muu
ja: 互換性のあるビリヤードゲーム: 10ボール; 15ボール; 8ボール; 9ボール; ケリープール; スヌーカー; ストレートプール/14.1; その他
en: Compatible billiard game: 10-ball; 15-ball; 8-ball; 9-ball; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool/14.1; Other
pt-PT: Jogo de bilhar compatível: Bola 10; Bola 15; Bola 8; Bola 9; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool/14.1; Outro
nl: Compatibel biljartspel: 10-ball; 15-ball; 8-ball; 9-ball; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool/14.1; Overige
sl-SI: Združljiva biljardna igra: Desetka; Petnajstka; Osmica; Devetka; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool/14.1; Drugo
nb: Kompatibelt biljardspill: 10-ball; 15-ball; 8-ball; 9-ball; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool/14.1; Annet
fr: Jeu de billard compatible: Jeu de la 10; Jeu de la 15; Jeu de la 8; Jeu de la 9; Kelly pool; Snooker; 14/1 continu; Autre
th: เกมบิลเลียดที่เข้ากันได้: พูล 10 ลูก; พูล 15 ลูก; พูล 8 ลูก; พูล 9 ลูก; เคลลี่พูล; สนุกเกอร์; สเตรตพูล/14.1; อื่นๆ
hu: Kompatibilis biliárdjáték: 10-es golyós; 15-ös golyós; 8-as golyós; 9-es golyós; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool / 14.1; Egyéb
pt-BR: Jogo de bilhar compatível: Bola 10; Bola 15; Bola 8; Bola 9; Kelly pool; Sinuca; Straight pool/14.1; Outro
it: Gioco di biliardo compatibile: Palla 10; Palla 15; Palla 8; Palla 9; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool/14.1; Altro
sv: Kompatibelt biljardspel: 10-ball; 15-ball; 8-ball; 9-ball; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool/14.1; Övrigt
sk-SK: Kompatibilná biliardová hra: 10-ball; 15-ball; 8-ball; 9-ball; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool/14.1; Iné
zh-TW: 相容撞球玩法: 10 號球; 15 號球; 8 號球; 9 號球; 凱利撞球; 司諾克; 14-1 連續擊球賽; 其他
da: Kompatibelt billardspil: 10-ball; 15-ball; 8-ball; 9-ball; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool/14.1; Andet
pl: Kompatybilna gra bilardowa: Dziesiątka; Piętnastka; Ósemka; Dziewiątka; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool / 14.1; Inna
ro-RO: Joc de biliard compatibil: Bila 10; Bila 15; Bila 8; Bila 9; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool/14.1; Altele
bg-BG: Съвместима игра на билярд: Десетка (10-ball); Петнайсетина (15-ball); Осмица (8-ball); Девятка (9-ball); Кели пул; Снукър; Стрейт пул/14.1; Друго
de: Kompatible Billardspielart: 10-Ball; 15-Ball; 8-Ball; 9-Ball; Kelly Pool; Snooker; Straight Pool / 14.1; Sonstige
vi: Trò chơi bi-a tương thích: Bi-a 10 bi; Bi-a 15 bi; Bi-a 8 bi; Bi-a 9 bi; Bi-a Kelly; Snooker; Straight pool/14.1; Khác
lt-LT: Suderinamas biliardo žaidimas: 10 rutulių; 15 rutulių; 8 rutulių; 9 rutulių; „Kelly pool“; Snukeris; Klasikinis pulas / 14.1; Kita
ru: Совместимая бильярдная игра: Десятка; Пятнашка; Восьмерка; Девятка; Келли-пул; Снукер; Стрейт-пул / 14.1; Другое
hr-HR: Kompatibilna igra biljara: Desetka; Petnaestica; Osmica; Devetka; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool (14.1); Ostalo
es: Juego de billar compatible: Bola 10; Bola 15; Bola 8; Bola 9; Kelly pool; Snooker; Straight pool/14.1; Otro
cs: Kompatibilní kulečníková hra: Desítka; Patnáctka; Osmička; Devítka; Kelly pool; Snooker; Nekonečná (14.1); Ostatní
ko: 호환 가능한 당구 게임: 10볼; 15볼; 8볼; 9볼; 켈리 풀; 스누커; 스트레이트 풀/14.1; 기타